Illinois, session 104th, SB845.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Governor's Office of New Americans Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 55/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Governor's Office of New Americans Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-467, eff. 1-1-14.)